extras/numerals.lexc
!! Numeral Lexc !!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Pl +Sg +V +P1sg +P2sg +P3sp +P1pl +P2pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Loc +Abl +Ins +P1 +P2 +P3 +Num +Subst +Ord +Dist +İfi +Cond +Nfh +Px1sg +Px2sg +Px3sp +Px2pl +Px3pl +İmp +Neg +Gpraor +Pres +Aor +Prog +Fut +Ger +Gerpast +Gerabst +Gernfh +Gpr_fut +Gpr_past +Gpr_rsub +Gpr_nfh +Gpr_aor +Gna_per +Gna_impf +Gna_ferq +Gna_when1 +Gna_when2 +Gna_time1 +Gna_time2 +Gna_cond +Gna_2 +Iv +Abil +Coop +Pass +Cau

Lexicon Root
Numeral ;

LEXICON Numeral
bir NUM;
iki NUM;
onbir NUM ; 
oniki NUM ; 
yirmi:yirmi NUM ; 
kırk:kırk NUM ;
elli:elli NUM ;
altmış:altmış NUM ; 
seksen:seksen NUM ;  
bin:bin NUM ;
milion:milion NUM ;
ikişär:ikişär NUM-DIST ;
üçär:üçär NUM-DIST ;
I:I NUM-ROMAN ; 
II:II NUM-ROMAN ; 
III:III NUM-ROMAN ; 
IV:IV NUM-ROMAN ; 
IX:IX NUM-ROMAN ; 
V:V NUM-ROMAN ; 
VI:VI NUM-ROMAN ; 
VII:VII NUM-ROMAN ; 
VIII:VIII NUM-ROMAN ; 
X:X NUM-ROMAN ; 
XI:XI NUM-ROMAN ; 
XII:XII NUM-ROMAN ; 
XIII:XIII NUM-ROMAN ; 
XIV:XIV NUM-ROMAN ; 
XIX:XIX NUM-ROMAN ; 
XV:XV NUM-ROMAN ; 
XVI:XVI NUM-ROMAN ; 
XVII:XVII NUM-ROMAN ; 
XVIII:XVIII NUM-ROMAN ; 
XX:XX NUM-ROMAN ; 
XXI:XXI NUM-ROMAN ; 
XXII:XXII NUM-ROMAN ; 


LEXICON NUM 
+Num: # ;
+Num+Ord:^inci # ;


LEXICON NUM-DIST

+Num+Dist: # ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN
+Num: # ;
